North Carolina statutes. Chapter 74A. Company Police.
§§ 74A-1 through 74A-6.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991 (Regular Session, 1992), c. 1043, s. 8.

Cross References.

For present provisions pertaining to the subject matter of this repealed chapter, see Chapter 74E.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1043, which repealed this chapter, in s. 9 provides: “A certification or commission issued under former Chapter 74A is considered to have been issued under Chapter 74E, as enacted by this act, and expires in accordance with Chapter 74E.”